Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 7 Federal Property In Arkansas
22-7-302. Concurrent jurisdiction over Fort Chaffee.

The State of Arkansas hereby accepts concurrent legislative jurisdiction with the United States of the following-described real property known as Fort Chaffee, Arkansas, from April 9, 1997, until the beginning of the first day of October 1997, and furthermore accepts exclusive legislative jurisdiction from the United States of the following-described real property known as Fort Chaffee, Arkansas, from and after the first day of October 1997, and thereafter.

The lands comprising Fort Chaffee, Arkansas, owned by or otherwise heretofore subject to the exclusive legislative jurisdiction of the United States in:

Sections 19, 30, and 31, of Township 8 North, Range 30 West;

Sections 23 — 28 inclusive, and 33 — 36 inclusive of Township 8 North, Range 31 West;

Sections 18, 19, 30, and 31 of Township 7 North, Range 28 West;

Sections 7, 8, 9, and 13 — 36 inclusive of Township 7 North, Range 29 West;

Sections 3 — 36 inclusive of Township 7 North, Range 30 West;

Sections 1 — 29 inclusive and Sections 35 and 36 of Township 7 North, Range 31 West;

Sections 1, 2, and 11 — 14 inclusive of Township 7 North, Range 32 West;

Sections 6 and 7 of Township 6 North, Range 28 West;

Sections 1 — 24 inclusive of Township 6 North, Range 29 West;

Sections 1 — 6 inclusive, Sections 10 — 15 inclusive, and Sections 22 — 24 inclusive of Township 6 North, Range 30 West; and

Sections 1 and 2, Township 6 North, Range 31 West, respectively located in Logan, Sebastian, Franklin, and Crawford Counties, Arkansas, and more accurately described and identified in accordance with §22-7-102 as follows:

(a)

The Highway 96 Right of Way in the Fort Chaffee U.S. Army Military Reservation, the same being a strip of Right of Way 80 feet in width and approximately 26,730.0 feet in length, situated in the County of Sebastian, State of Arkansas, being a part of sections 9, 16, 21, 28, 33, and 32, Township 7 North, Range 30 West of the 5th Principal Meridian, and containing 49.10 acres, more or less.

(b)

The Highway 22 Right of Way in the Fort Chaffee U.S. Army Military Reservation, the same being all of six (6) tracts or parcels of land contained within the following metes and bounds, namely:

(1)

Parcel No. 1, 36.50 acres: A tract of land situated in the County of Sebastian, State of Arkansas, being part of Sections Nos. 3, 2, & 1, Township 7 North, Range 31 West of the 5th Principal Meridian, and being more particularly described as follows:

From the corner common to Sections Nos. 3 & 4 of said Township 7 North and Sections Nos. 33 and 34 of Township 8 North, Range 31 West, situated in a Westerly boundary line for Fort Chaffee, along the common line between said Sections Nos. 3 & 4, same being a Westerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, South 00°25' East, 745 feet, more or less to the point of beginning, said point of beginning being the intersection of said Westerly boundary line for Fort Chaffee with the Northerly Right of Way line for the relocation of State Highway No. 22 and being located 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline for said relocation;

Thence along the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation of Highway No. 22 as follows: 60 feet Northeasterly of and concentric to the arc of a 01°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 5729.65 feet; tangent distance = 325.2 feet; central angle = 00°31') along a curve to the left 515 feet, more or less to a point 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 345+58.10 on the centerline for said relocation;

Thence 60 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline South 69°05' East, 698.4 feet to a point 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 354+56.5 feet on the centerline for said relocation;

Thence 60 feet Northeasterly of and concentric to the arc of a 03°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 1910.08 feet; tangent distance = 213.1 feet; central angle = 12°44') along a curve to the right 316.19 feet to a point 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 357+65 on the centerline for said relocation, said point being the intersection of the Northerly Right of Way line for the relocation of said Highway No. 22 with the existing Northerly Right of Way line for Highway No. 22;

Thence departing from the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation along the existing Northerly Right of Way line for said Highway No. 22 in a general Southeasterly direction approximately 1686 feet to a point in the Southerly Right of Way line for the Missouri Pacific Railroad, said point being located 50 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline for said Missouri Pacific Railroad;

Thence along the Southerly Right of Way line for said Missouri Pacific Railroad, 50 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to the centerline for said Missouri Pacific Railroad, South 77°50' East, 25 feet, more or less to a point for the intersection of the Southerly Right of Way line for said Missouri Pacific Railroad with the Northerly Right of Way line for the relocation of said Highway No. 22 and being located 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 374+10 of the centerline for said relocation;

Thence along the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: 60 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to the centerline for said relocation, South 56°21' East, 8.6 feet to a point 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 374+18.6 on the centerline for said relocation;

Thence 60 feet Northeasterly of and concentric to the arc of a 06°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 955.37 feet; tangent distance = 214.0 feet; central angle = 25°16') along a curve to the left, 394.65 feet to a point 60 feet Northerly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 378+39.7 back, Sta. 379+49.2 ahead on the centerline for said relocation;

Thence 60 feet Northerly of and parallel to said centerline, South 81°37' east 1440.80 feet to a point 60 feet Northerly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 393+90 on the centerline for said relocation;

Thence South 78°49' East, 510.61 feet to a point 35 feet Northerly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 399+00 on the centerline for said relocation, said point also being situated in the existing Northerly Right of Way line for said Highway No. 22;

Thence departing from the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation of Highway No. 22, along the existing Northerly Right of Way line for said Highway No. 22, 35 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline South 81°25' East, 400 feet, more or less, to a point 35 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline, said point being the intersection of said existing Northerly Right of Way line with the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation;

Thence along the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: perpendicular to said centerline North 08°35' East 25 feet to a point 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline for said relocation;

Thence 60 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline, South 81°25' East, 1203 feet more or less to a point 60 feet Northerly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 415+03.4 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Northerly of and concentric to the arc of a 03°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 1910.08 feet; tangent distance = 326.5 feet; central angle = 19°24') along a curve to the left, 626.39 feet to a point 60 feet Northerly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 421+50.1 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Northerly of and parallel to said centerline North 79°11' East, 2466.5 feet to a point 60 feet Northwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 446+16.6 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Northerly of and concentric to the arc of a 01°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 5729.65 feet; tangent distance = 118.4 feet; central angle 02°22') along a curve to the left, 234.22 feet to a point 60 feet Northerly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 448+53.3 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Northerly of and parallel to said centerline, North 76°49' East, 1474.81 feet to a point in an Easterly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee;

Thence departing from the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation along said Easterly boundary line for Fort Chaffee, South 123.25 feet to a point 60 feet Southerly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline for said relocation;

Thence along the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: 60 feet Southerly of and parallel to said centerline line South 76°49' West, 1446.70 feet to a point 60 feet Southerly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 448+53.3 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southerly of and concentric to the arc of a 01°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 5729.65 feet; tangent distance = 118.4 feet; central angle = 02°22') along a curve to the right 239.18 feet to a point 60 feet Southerly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 446+16.6 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southerly of and parallel to said centerline South 79°11' West, 2468.5 feet to a point 60 feet Southerly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 421+50.1 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southerly of and concentric to the arc of a 03°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 1910.08 feet; tangent distance = 326.5 feet; central angle = 19°24') along a curve to the right, 667.0 feet to a point 60 feet Southerly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 415+03.4 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline North 81°25' West, 1603.4 feet to a point 60 feet Southerly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 399+00 on said centerline;

Thence perpendicular to said centerline North 08°35' East, 25 feet to a point 35 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline, said point being the intersection of the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation, with the existing Southerly Right of Way line for said Highway No. 22;

Thence departing from the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation, along the existing Southerly Right of Way line for said Highway No. 22, North 81°37' West, 3183.04 feet to a point 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 376+25 on the centerline for said relocation, said point also being the intersection of said existing Southerly Right of Way line with the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation;

Thence along the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: 60 feet Southwesterly of and concentric to the arc of a 06°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 955.37 feet; tangent distance = 214.00 feet; central angle = 25°16') along a curve to the right 219.36 feet to a point 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 374+18.6 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline North 56°21' West, 1537.7 feet to a point 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 358+80.9 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southwesterly of and concentric to the arc of a 03°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 1910.08 feet; tangent distance = 213.1 feet; central angle = 12°44') along a curve to the left 411.07 feet to a point 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 354+56.5 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline, North 69°05' West, 658.4 feet to a point to a point 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 345+58.1 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southwesterly of and concentric to the arc of a 01°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 5729.65 feet; tangent distance = 326.2 feet; central angle = 06°31') along a curve to the right 465 feet, more or less, to a point in a Westerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, same being the common line between said Sections Nos. 3 & 4 of said Township 7 North, Range 31 West;

Thence departing from the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation, along said common section line, same being a Westerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, North 00°28' West, 135 feet, more or less to the point of beginning, containing 36.50 acres, more or less.

(2)

Parcel No. 2, 10.28 acres: A tract of land situated in the County of Sebastian, State of Arkansas, being part of Section No. 5, Township 7 North, Range 30 West of the 5th Principal Meridian and being more particularly described as follows:

From the Northwest corner of the NW ¼ of Section 5 same being the corner common to Sections Nos. 5 & 6, Township 7 North, Range 30 West, along the common line between said Sections Nos. 5 & 6 South 1518 feet, more or less to the point of beginning, said point of beginning being the intersection of a Northwest corner for said Fort Chaffee with the Northerly Right of Way line for the relocation of State Highway No. 22 and being located 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline for said relocation;

Thence along the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation, same being a Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee as follows: 60 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline South 68°01' East, 361 feet, more or less to a point 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 574+21.8 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Northeasterly of and concentric to the arc of a 02°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 2864.93 feet; tangent distance = 321.00 feet; central angle = 12°47') along a curve to the left, 424.91 feet to a point for the intersection of the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation, with the existing Northerly Right of Way line for said Highway No. 22 and being located 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 578+55.6 on the centerline for said relocation;

Thence departing from the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation, along the existing Northerly Right of Way line as follows: perpendicular to said centerline North 13°18' East, 15 feet to a point 75 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 572+55.8 on said centerline;

Thence 75 feet Northeasterly of and concentric to the arc of a 02°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 2864.93 feet; tangent distance 361.00 feet; central angle = 12°47') along a curve to the left, 199.83 feet to a point 75 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 580+61 on the centerline for said relocation;

Thence 75 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline, South 80°48' East, 439 feet to a point for the intersection of said existing Northerly Right of Way line with the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation and being located 75 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 585+00 on said centerline;

Thence departing from said existing Northerly Right of Way line, along the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: perpendicular to said centerline North 09°12' East, 15 feet to a point 90 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 585+00 on said centerline;

Thence 90 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline, South 80°48' East, 400 feet to a point 90 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 589+00 on said centerline;

Thence perpendicular to said centerline, North 09°12' East, 35 feet to a point 125 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 589+00 on said centerline;

Thence 125 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline, South 80°48' East, 855 feet, more or less, to a point for a Northeast corner for said Fort Chaffee and being located 125 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence departing from said Northerly Right of Way line along said Easterly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, South 202.61 feet to a point in the existing Southerly Right of Way line for said Highway No. 22 and being located 75 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline for said relocation;

Thence departing from the boundary line for said Fort Chaffee along said existing Southerly Right of Way line, 75 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline North 80°48' West, 187 feet, more or less, to a point for the intersection of said existing Southerly Right of Way line with the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation and being located 75 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 596+00 on said centerline;

Thence along the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: Perpendicular to said centerline, South 09°12' West, 25 feet to a point 100 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 596+00 on said centerline;

Thence 100 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline, North 80°48' West, 700 feet to a point 100 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 589+00 on said centerline;

Thence perpendicular to said centerline North 09°12' East, 25 feet to point in the existing Southerly Right of Way line and being located 75 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 589+00 on said centerline;

Thence departing from the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation along the existing Southerly Right of Way line as follows: 75 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline North 80°48' West, 839 feet to a point 75 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 580+61 on said centerline;

Thence 75 feet Southwesterly of and concentric to the arc of a 02°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 2864.93 feet; tangent distance = 321 feet; central angle = 12°47') along a curve to the right 210.57 feet to a point 75 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 578+55.8 on said centerline;

Thence perpendicular to said centerline North 13°18' East, 15 feet to a point for the intersection of said existing Southerly Right of Way line with the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation, said point being 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 578+55.8 on said centerline;

Thence departing from said existing Southerly Right of Way line along the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: 60 feet Southwesterly of and concentric to the arc of a 02°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 2864.93 feet; tangent distance = 321 feet; central angle = 12°47') along a curve to the right 443.09 feet to a point 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 574+21.8 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline North 66°01' West, 313 feet, more or less, to a point in a Westerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, same being the common line between said Sections Nos. 5 & 6, Township 7 North, Range 30 West;

Thence departing from the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation along said common section line, same being a Westerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee North 129.41 feet to the point of beginning, containing 10.28 acres, more or less.

(3)

Parcel No. 3, 9.03 acres: A tract of land situated in the County of Sebastian, State of Arkansas, being part of Section No. 10, Township 7 North, Range 30 West of the 5th Principal Meridian and being more particularly described as follows:

From the corner common to Sections Nos. 3, 4, 9, & 10, Township 7 North, Range 30 West, situated in a Northerly boundary line for Fort Chaffee, along the common line between said Sections Nos. 3 & 10, same being the Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee East, 510.17 feet to the point of beginning, said point of beginning being the intersection of said Northerly boundary line with the Southerly Right of Way line for the relocation of State Highway No. 22 and being located 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline for said relocation;

Thence continuing along said common section line same being a Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee East, 767.12 feet to a point in the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation and being located 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence along the boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, same being the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: 60 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline, South 81°00' East, 2586.1 feet to a point 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 744+51.1 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Northeasterly of and concentric to the arc of a 01°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 5729.65 feet; tangent distance = 118.4 feet; central angle = 02°22') along a curve to the right, 239.18 feet to a point 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 746+87.8 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Northeasterly of and parallel to said centerline, South 78°38' East, 37.95 feet to a point for a Northeast corner of said Fort Chaffee and being located 60 feet Northeasterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence departing from said Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation, along an Easterly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee South 01°05' East, 122.89 feet to a point in the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation and being located 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence departing from the boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, along the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: 60 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline, North 78°38' West, 84.44 feet to a point 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 746+87.8 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southwesterly of and concentric to the arc of a 01°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 5729.65 feet; tangent distance = 118.4 feet; central angle = 02°22') along a curve to the left, 234.22 feet to a point 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 744+51.1 on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline; North 81°00' West, 3343.78 feet to the point of beginning, containing 9.03 acres, more or less.

(4)

Parcel No. 4, 0.09 acre: A tract of land situated in the County of Sebastian, State of Arkansas, being part of Section No. 10, Township 7 North, Range 30 West of the 5th Principal Meridian and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a Northeast corner for Fort Chaffee, said point of beginning being the intersection of said corner with the existing Southerly Right of Way line for State Highway No. 22, situated in the common line between said Section No. 10 and Section No. 11, Township 7 North, Range 30 West and being located 35 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline for the relocation of State Highway No. 22;

Thence along the boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, same being the common line between said Sections 10 & 11, South 25.50 feet to a point in the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation and being located 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence along said Right of Way line 60 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline, North 78°38' West, 335 feet, more or less, to a point for the intersection of said Southerly right of way line for said relocation with a North boundary line for said Fort Chaffee and being located 60 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence along a Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee South 82°55' East, 331 feet, more or less to the point of beginning, containing 0.09 acre, more or less.

(5)

Parcel No. 5, 0.70 acre: A tract of land situated in the County of Sebastian, State of Arkansas, being part of Section 17, Township 7 North, Range 29 West of the 5th Principal Meridian and being more particularly described as follows:

From the Northwest corner of the NE¼ of said Section 17, Township 7 North, Range 29 West, situated in the Northerly boundary line for Fort Chaffee, same being the common line between Sections Nos. 17 and 8 of said Township 7 North, Range 29 West, along said common section line, same being the Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, East, 300 feet, more or less, to the point of beginning, said point of beginning being the intersection of said Northerly boundary line with the Southerly Right of Way line for the relocation of State Highway No. 22 and being located 75 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from the centerline of said relocation;

Thence continuing along said common section line, same being the Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, East 222.27 feet to a point in the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation and being located 60 feet Northerly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence along the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation, 60 feet Northeasterly of and concentric to the arc of a 04°00' curve on said centerline, in a Southeasterly direction approximately 92 feet to a point in an Easterly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee;

Thence along said boundary line South 160 feet, more or less to a point in the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation and being located 75 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence along said Southerly Right of Way line as follows: 75 feet Southwesterly of and concentric to the arc of a 04°00' curve on said centerline, in a Northwesterly direction approximately 220 feet, more or less, to a point 75 feet Southwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. C. Sta. 965+48.3 on said centerline;

Thence 75 feet Southwesterly of and parallel to said centerline North 52°36' West, 140 feet, more or less, to the point of beginning, containing 0.70 acre, more or less.

(6)

Parcel No. 6, 5.25 acres: A tract of land situated in the County of Sebastian, State of Arkansas, being part of Section No. 17, Township 7 North, Range 29 West of the 5th Principal Meridian and being more particularly described as follows:

From the corner common to Sections Nos. 8, 9, 16 & 17 of said Township 7 North, Range 29 West, situated in the Northerly boundary line for Fort Chaffee, along the common line between said Sections 8 & 17, same being the Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee, West 20 feet, more or less, to the point of beginning, said point of beginning being the intersection of the Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee with the Southerly Right of Way line for the relocation of State Highway No. 22 and being located 60 feet Southeasterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 988+50.15 on the centerline for said relocation;

Thence along said Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: 60 feet Southeasterly of and parallel to said centerline, South 66°14' West, 718.05 feet to a point 60 feet Southeasterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 580+77.5 back, 981+32.1 ahead, on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Southeasterly of and concentric to the arc of a 04°00' curve on said centerline in a Southwesterly direction approximately 245 feet to a point for the intersection of said Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation with the existing Southerly Right of Way line for said Highway No. 22 and being located 60 feet Southeasterly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence departing from the Southerly Right of Way line for said relocation along the existing Southerly Right of Way in a Westerly direction approximately 580 feet to a point in a Northerly boundary line for said Fort Chaffee;

Thence along a boundary line for said Fort Chaffee as follows: East, 465 feet, more or less, to a point for a re-entrant corner of Fort Chaffee;

Thence North 70 feet, more or less, to a point in the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation and being located 60 feet Northerly of and perpendicular distance from said centerline;

Thence along the Northerly Right of Way line for said relocation as follows: 60 feet Northwesterly of and concentric to the arc of a 04°00' curve on said centerline (radius = 1432.69 feet; tangent distance = 846.6 feet; central angle = 61°10') along a curve to the left 649.13 feet to a point 60 feet Northwesterly of and perpendicular distance from P. T. Sta. 980+77.5 back, 981+32.1, ahead on said centerline;

Thence 60 feet Northwesterly of and parallel to said centerline North 66°14' East, 444.55 feet to a point in the common line between said Sections 8 & 17 and being located 60 feet Northwesterly of and perpendicular distance from Sta. 985+76.65 on said centerline;

Thence along said common section line East, 297.76 feet to the point of beginning, containing 5.25 acres, more or less.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1260, § 2.

22-7-303. Description of land.

From and after passage of this subchapter, and upon receipt by the Governor of any subsequent surveys and descriptions of the lands and areas of Fort Chaffee prepared at the direction of the United States Army Corps of Engineers which may describe lands or areas which are erroneously described in this subchapter, or which may describe lands and areas which are omitted from the descriptions of lands and areas in this subchapter, the Governor is authorized to amend and correct the descriptions of said lands or areas so as to include such lands or areas within the jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas as is exercised over other lands generally within this state, by causing such subsequent surveys and descriptions to be filed with the Secretary of State and with the respective circuit clerks and recorders of Franklin, Logan, Sebastian, and Crawford Counties.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1260, § 3.

22-7-304. Resolution of discrepancies in description of land.

Any discrepancy in the descriptions set forth in this subchapter and in the descriptions of any subsequent surveys prepared by the United States Army Corps of Engineers shall be resolved and interpreted as to extend the legislative jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas over all lands within the borders of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1260, § 4.

22-7-305. Filing requirement.

A copy of this subchapter shall be filed with the respective circuit clerks and recorders of Franklin, Logan, Sebastian, and Crawford Counties, Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1260, § 5.

22-7-306. Construction of subchapter.

(a)

This subchapter shall not be construed or interpreted to the effect that the State of Arkansas by this subchapter proposes, purposes, or intends to alter, diminish, take, or enlarge any estate in lands, boundary between lands, interest in or title to any estate in lands which may be described in this subchapter as to any person, firm, corporation, government, political subdivision, or entity as to any interest in any estate in the lands and areas described herein, except to assert the sovereignty and jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas over said lands as it exercises over other lands generally within this state.

(b)

This subchapter shall not be construed or interpreted to the effect that the State of Arkansas by this subchapter proposes, purposes, or intends to determine, fix, compromise, confirm, cloud, affect, or settle any ownership, lien, boundary, claim, or interest in or title to any estate encompassed by the lands described in this subchapter as to any person, firm, corporation, government, political subdivision, or entity as to any interest in any estate in the lands and areas described herein, except to assert the sovereignty and jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas over said lands as it exercises over other lands generally within this state.

(c)

This subchapter shall not be construed or interpreted to the effect that the State of Arkansas by this subchapter accepts, assumes, or undertakes financial liability for the remediation of any lands or areas which may exist in violation of the environmental protection laws, rules, and regulations of the United States or of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1260, § 6.